Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2215
Mailing published notice; proof.

The party instituting or maintaining the proceeding or his attorney is required to mail the published notice and give proof thereof in accordance with section 25-520.01.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 15.